District of Columbia statutes.
3-1209.06

Psychology associate.

(a)

A person who is engaged as a psychology associate in the District shall register with the Mayor, renew the registration as required by rule, and pay the required registration fee established by the Mayor.

(b)

A person registered to practice as a psychology associate may provide psychological services and activities while under the direct supervision of a psychiatrist, or a licensed psychologist with a doctoral degree in psychology.

(c)

A psychology associate shall have graduated from an accredited college or university with at least a Master’s degree based on a program of studies primarily focusing on psychology, or a program judged by the Board to be substantially equivalent in subject matter and extent of training to a master’s or doctoral degree in psychology.

(d)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules further setting forth the education and experience needed to qualify as a psychology associate.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 906
as added July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-14, § 2(e), 56 DCR 3613